Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3817
Corporation; reserves.

A corporation organized under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 shall maintain the reserves necessary for the sound operation of its prepaid dental service plans, including unearned payment reserves. The amount and manner of calculating such reserves shall be determined by rule and regulation of the director.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 17.